updates/files/_internal/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_hu_HU.dic
.orvostünte1té
.vizele1ti
.mikrolé2g1á2ram
.trük8k7a8rzenál
.gázárs1ta
.hó1da
.érté1ke
.harma8d7á8rér2t.
.ina8s7s8z8olg
.ökop2ro1ﬁ
.ifjú1de
.vitorl8a7t8rimm
.trükkö1zö
.gala8j7ö8lő
.levesa1la
.villa8n8y7i8z1zó
.mellkas2s2z
.ha8s7p8uﬀadás
.nappalita1go
.harmadá1ro
.bio2r1é2g
.üdül8ő7a8partman
.vendéglátó8s7z8e1né
.ökopszi1c2h
.biore1me
.vias2z
hármas1s1ze
.gol2y
.kelengye2seg
.rapsz1tá
.vakablak1so
.ban1tu
.kö1te
.csoda1kü
.p2asiv
.farokkur1tí
vizes3zsem
.multior1ga
.bio2mar
.halk1ré
.nyíra1c1sá
.vállalkozósz1fé
.giccs1em1be
.agrára1dó
.háló1za
.videokölc2s
.találkane1gye
.napp2
.budisp2r
.troli1te
.szem1rá
.ká1de
.szexs1ho
.kultú8r7v8igéc
.mécsespo1há
.hó1le
.glettan2y
.bionyersa1nya
.vállé1ri
.húsá1ra
.mókussz1ül
.bor8s7í8z
.kö1ze
.uráná2t1a2la1kí
.magá8n7i8román
.min1ik1ra
.eur8o7s8z8kep1ti
söc5csük/cs=,3,1
.farokkurtí1tá
.túr8a7s8í
.felhősü1ve
.sí8k7g8rá1ﬁ
.büdzsékritéri1u
.túzo8k7é8lőhel
.csúsz2ó1s1zá
.hárma8s7o8ltár
.vitagerjes2z
.magá8n7i8ngatlan
.rádi1ó
.marihuán8a7p8iac
.krumpl8i7s8z8ár
.kés1s1ze
.mini1ga
.webla8p7l8etiltás
hármasszeg1le
.g1le
.passze1le
.skanzenét1te
.westerna1b
.érettségi1a
.bes7szek/sz=,3,1
.zönges2z
.mikro2l1él
.nyu2sz1i2s1za
.kulcstrans2z
.tini2n1ind
.föl8d7ö8svén
.buz2i2k1u2r
.te1le8k7l8eve1le
.sertés1s1zü
.parket8t7f8ríz
.expres8s8z7b8us2z
.makro2m1é2re
.tengeril1la
.zár8ó7s8tift
.ká1li
.csiszol8ó7s8tift
.bázi8s7á8r.
.pas1s1ze
.gum8i7s8top1li
.e1bá
.túzokélő1he
.csecsem8ő7p8rac1li
.trol8i7t8elep
.fű2z1a2b
.bo8r7s8ét2a.
.pupillatágas1sá
.orgonata1bu
.vegyesú1s1zó
.magánarboré1tu
.ps2z
.sí8k7g8ráf
.patkós2z
.vendé1ge
.békes2z
.hó2l1e2ped
.ze2n1e2ger
.bába1ni
.ti1ni
mec1c1sé
.mobi8l7ó8riás
.fitne1s1ze
.ár1nya
mec1c1sü
.mini1mu
.mósu1s1zi
.sor8s7s8z8eszél2y
.emléku1ta
.almaneg2y
.ﬁ3ók
.hos5szad/sz=,3,1
.kortesí2r
.híds1ka
.hos8s8z7a8célbetét
.tollasszún2y
.e2g1o2koz
.terhes1s1ze
.necct2ri
.vizeletin1ko
.ára9m8á9ró2l.
.szemüve1gü
.bükkel1
.bázi1sá
.vegye1sú
.csis2z
.min8i7a8cél1mű
.bi8o7p8esztic
.ejtőe2r
.kelengyes1e1gé
.mikrorepe1dé
.vide8o7s8z8tár
.makro2ge2r
.pszeud8o7v8i1t2a
.moz8i7é8pület
.kárpi1to
.héli1u
.autós1po
.fosszili8s7a8la1pú
.lé1ti
.ifjúdemok1ra
.videopályá1za
.baromfi1ó
.ab1la
.mobili2rod
.rapsz2t
.bádo1gí
.részg1rá
.meg8g8y7ö8ntet
.visszé1re
.mikrokli1ma
.vona8l7i8mpedan1ci
.sze8x7é8hes
.mikromorfo1ló
.bí1bo
.roc8k7s8z8tár
.rajzfilmanimá1to
neme8s7s8z8e1ghy
.alg8a7s8pór
.gyere1ku
.video1há
.rozéké1s1zí
.mikro2ad
.bioszál1lo
.törpelétesít1mé
.ka8r7á8ttétel
.fel1nő
.nyírac2s
.luxusapart1ma
.pis7sz2e./sz=,3,1
mec5csemi2g./cs=,3,1
.l8é7t8artal
.epe8r7ö8ntet
.ﬁtneszö2l
.kultúrarcu1la
.öblítőp2ro
.2b1i2on
.fosszili1sa
.léti2s2z
.ejtőernyős1po
.ter1mé
.s2ztalagm2itos2z
.eg8o7k8ozmos
.eperön1te
.ti1ze
.spinál1lá
.revans1po
gerinces2s2z
.mandula2n1ug
.moz8i7a8dat
.la1vi
.mikro2sz1ing
puc5csis1ta/cs=,3,1
.we1bű
.videóasszis2z
.job1bá
.mikrot1ra
.mikrot1ro
.zuhan8ó7r8ác
.hosszú1s1zá
.varáz8s7ö8v
.héliu1mi
.e2ge1ré
.geno8m7a8la1pú
.vasuta1si
.termikelsza1ka
.forrá8s7a8mné1zi
mec5csedb2e./cs=,3,1
.teje1lő
.zsinó8r7e8lka1pó
.kárpito8s7s8z8ög
.s2it1te
.progia2ján
.tini2ad
.tini2am
.magá8n7s8í2r
.teve1to
.bi1ci
.videofrek1ve
.makr8o7m8uta1tó
.vonósnég2y
.mikro1ré
.la1ká
.síszál1lá
.zu8g7ó8rás
szarvas1s
.kor2a1s1zü
.héliu8m7i8on
.klez1me
.sza1lá
.kence1fi
.mikr8o7m8éret
ﬀröc5csünk/cs=,4,1
.iste1ni
.karátté1te
.ejtő1e2
.rádiós1ká
.fé8l7m8att
.al1ga
.magán1sí
.ven1dé
.geno1ma
.al1gr
.hüvelyk1ré
.mikrosz1ó2r
.trük8k7u8tómunk
.veg8a7k8a1já
.g2o1lyó
.farkaspopu1lá
.hálózatá2tal
.öko1kú
.faze1ka
.félá2l
.bio1s1zá
.zaba2rat
.hos1s1zé2
.minimu8m7á8r.
.min8i7g8arzon
.a1nya
.áramár1c1sö
.birkózód1re
.gic1c1se
.mág1ne
.zsel8é7k8rém
.za1gyü
gic5cse1sí/cs=,3,1
.al1ko
.in2a1s2ta
.ö1ko
.talá1la
.ge1no
.tőkeglobalizá1ci
.fél2mat
.magáné2rin
.deviza1a
.sitteltakarí1tá
.szere1te
.kulc2s
.szalm8a7k8rump1li
.audi2o
.vize1le
.ár1nyé
.va8k7a8blakná2l.
.al1ma
.cseppa1la
.makr8o7r8égi1ó
.mikrogé1pe
.vill8a7m8o8s7t8ranzit
.rezg8ő7n8y8ár1ﬁ
.rezg8ő7n8y8ár1ﬂ
.eu1ró
.ﬁtneszöl1tö
giccses1né
gic5csemi2g./cs=,3,1
.mikr8o7k8vadrát
meccsem1tő
.szexsz1to
.ménesinté1ze
.gyümölcsösül1te
.ge1ri
.pszeud8o7k8eresztén
.sa1sa
.meg5gyö
.bokszae1ro
.gumis1to
.kapust2
.zsák1kö
meccsed1be
.helyet1te
.tin8i7m8o1zi
.via1s1ze
.via1s1zi
.za1ba
.dzses8s8z7é8nek
.áramárc2s
.ka1bá
.illatá1ra
.eu1ro
.sziré8n7é8nek
.címtrans2z1
.bulid1ro
.magánambí1ci
.ökohá1ló
.kosara1s2l
.min8i7b8otrán
.fénye2m8is
.kultú1ra
.soros2z
.tárgya1ni
.al1sk
.karbonátképző1dé
.grá1fé
.giccsér1ze
.neutro8n7ﬂuxus
.magáningat1la
.lépfe1ne
.mintaprivatizá1ci
.makro1mé
.mele8g7ü8g
.bion1ö2v
.pacsuli2a1ro
.ti2n1i2m
.magánér1te
.talála8t7e8l1é2rés
.vil1la
.magán1s1za
.vetőma1gá
.kalmára1la
.környeze8t7e8pidem
.skan1ze
.büdzsék1ri
.mandu1la
.video1be
.kelen2gy1es
.tec8h7ó8riás
.mini2t1ér
.törita1ná
.vál8l7é8rintés
meccsed1he
.világos3s
.ök8o7h8álózat
.csiszolós1ti
.anti2a1me
.proﬁlegye1ne
giccsen1ké
.teleká2t1í2r
.mobila1da
.középál1lá
.tec2h
.ké2r1ü2g
.ké1rü2
.k8é7r8ü8g7m8
